Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.090

Labor required.

(1) The board shall require of every able bodied offender confined in a state correctional institution for a crime committed before July 1, 1984, as many hours of faithful labor in each and every day during his or her term of imprisonment as shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the institution in which he or she is confined.

(2) Offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2001, shall perform work or other programming as required by the department of corrections during their term of confinement.

[ 2009 c 28 s 25; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 329; 1999 c 143 s 20; 1955 c 133 s 10. Prior: 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. s 10249-2, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Labor by prisoners: Chapter 72.64 RCW.